src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Cornish noun morphology

## Masculine stem classes
The nouns get tags (to the left of :, i.e. in the upper representation
and the suffixes are found to the left of the colon

* **LEXICON m** 

* **LEXICON m-yow** 

* **LEXICON m-ow** 

* **LEXICON m-ys** 

* **LEXICON m-es** 

* **LEXICON m-s** 

* **LEXICON m-yon** 

* **LEXICON m-aff-i** 

* **LEXICON m-ag** 

* **LEXICON m-sgtantum** 

* **LEXICON m-pltantum** 

## Feminine stem classes

* **LEXICON f** 

* **LEXICON f-yow** 

* **LEXICON f-edh** 

Nest step:

Here we add suffixes. These may be common to several stem classes
and are therefore pointed to in a different layer (this one)

## Number lexica

* **LEXICON sg** 

* **LEXICON yonpl** 

* **LEXICON owpl** 

* **LEXICON yowpl** 

* **LEXICON ipl** 

* **LEXICON yspl** 

* **LEXICON espl** 

* **LEXICON edhpl** 

* **LEXICON spl** 

* **LEXICON adjd** 

### Irregular plurals

* **LEXICON KI** 

* **LEXICON DEN** 

* **LEXICON OJYON** 

* **LEXICON GARLONT** 

# Mutation lexicon

* **LEXICON mutation** 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-cor/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
